Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Ordinances and Violations

7-81-401. Form of ordinances — Effective date.

All ordinances passed by the assembly shall begin by an enacting clause as follows: “Be it enacted by the mayor and town assembly of (fill in blank with name of town),” and shall at the end of the act state the time when the ordinance is to take effect, otherwise it will take effect ten (10) days from passage.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 20; Shan., § 2023a36; Code 1932, § 3667; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2520.

7-81-402. Ordinance procedure.

No ordinance shall become a law without having been passed at two (2) separate meetings by a majority of all the votes of the town and signed by the mayor. It is the duty of the mayor to carefully examine all ordinances passed, and should any of them not meet such mayor's approbation, to return the ordinance to the next meeting of the assembly with such mayor's objection in writing. No law or ordinance so vetoed by the mayor shall go into effect unless the law or ordinance be passed by a majority of the whole number of voters of the town. If the mayor fails to return any ordinance to the next meeting of the assembly, such mayor shall be deemed to have approved the ordinance, and the ordinance shall take effect without further action.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 21; Shan., §§ 2023a37-2023a40; Code 1932, §§ 3668-3671; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2521.

7-81-403. Fines for violation of ordinances — Lien of judgment.

The violation of any ordinance or law of the town shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00), recoverable before the mayor of the town upon warrant issued as for the recovery of the debt before a judge of the court of general sessions. The judgment, when so recovered, shall constitute a lien on the realty of the defendant situate within the corporate limits of the town.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 26; Shan., § 2023a51; Code 1932, § 3682; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2531.

7-81-404. Confinement for violation of ordinances.

Any town incorporated under this chapter has the power to erect and maintain a calaboose or workhouse for the confinement and detention of persons violating any ordinance of the corporation. A person who fails to pay any fine and costs imposed by the corporation commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1903, ch. 477, § 3; Shan., § 2023a53; Code 1932, § 3684; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2532; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.